Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5395XS (3) 91 lh/jh S.F. 2271 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 216C.13 Captioning in motion 1 picture theaters. 2 1. For purposes of this section, unless the context 3 otherwise requires: 4 a. âClosed captioningâ means the written display of a motion 5 pictureâs dialogue or transcript, including but not limited to 6 nonspeech information such as music, character identities, and 7 other sounds or sound effects by means of a personal captioning 8 device that delivers captions to individual patrons. 9 b. âLarge motion picture theater companyâ means any person 10 who controls, operates, owns, or leases five or more motion 11 picture theaters in this state. 12 c. âMotion picture theaterâ means an establishment in which 13 motion pictures are regularly exhibited to the public for an 14 admission charge. 15 d. âOpen captioningâ means the written, on-screen display 16 of a motion pictureâs dialogue and nonspeech information, 17 including but not limited to music, the identity of the 18 character speaking, or other sounds and sound effects. 19 e. âSmall motion picture theater companyâ means any person 20 who controls, operates, owns, or leases between one and four 21 motion picture theaters in this state. 22 2. A motion picture theater shall provide access to fully 23 operational and well-maintained closed captioning technology 24 for each screening of a motion picture that is produced and 25 available with closed captioning as required by Tit. III of the 26 federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990. 27 3. If a motion picture is produced with open captioning and 28 distributed to motion picture theaters, a large motion picture 29 theater company shall provide open captioning screenings 30 of such motion picture that has at least five scheduled 31 screenings at that theater, provided that the theater has 32 digital projection systems that support open captioning files. 33 Such open captioning screenings must occur within each of the 34 following time periods: 35 -1- LSB 5395XS (3) 91 lh/jh 1/ 4 S.F. 2271 a. Within each of the first two weeks of such a motion 1 pictureâs release, the motion picture theater shall provide 2 at least two open captioning screenings, of which at least 3 one must begin between 5:59 p.m. and 11:01 p.m. on Fridays or 4 between 10:59 a.m. and 11:01 p.m. on Saturdays or Sundays. 5 b. Within each week after the first two weeks of such a 6 motion pictureâs release, the motion picture theater shall 7 provide at least one open captioning screening per week, 8 which must begin between 5:59 p.m. and 10:01 p.m. on Mondays, 9 Tuesdays, Wednesdays, or Thursdays; between 5:59 p.m. and 10 11:01 p.m. on Fridays; or between 10:59 a.m. and 11:01 p.m. on 11 Saturdays or Sundays. 12 4. If a motion picture is produced with open captioning 13 and distributed to motion picture theaters, a small motion 14 picture theater company shall, at each theater that has digital 15 projection systems that support open captioning files, provide 16 at least one of the following: 17 a. An open captioning screening within eight calendar days 18 after receiving a request pursuant to subsection 6. 19 b. Open captioning consistent with the requirements for 20 motion picture theaters pursuant to subsection 3. 21 5. This section shall not prevent a motion picture theater 22 from offering more open captioning screenings than required 23 under this section. 24 6. Motion picture theaters shall provide contact 25 information on the motion picture theaterâs internet site for 26 the purpose of receiving and fulfilling requests for open 27 captioning screenings. 28 7. If an open captioning screening of a motion picture 29 overlaps with one or more other open captioning screenings of 30 the same motion picture at the same motion picture theater, 31 no more than one such motion picture screening may be counted 32 toward the minimum number of screenings required by this 33 section, except where it is not practicable to avoid such 34 overlap. 35 -2- LSB 5395XS (3) 91 lh/jh 2/ 4 S.F. 2271 8. A motion picture theater shall advertise the date and 1 time of open captioning screenings in the same manner as the 2 motion picture theater advertises all other motion picture 3 screenings and indicate which screenings will include open 4 captioning by using the character symbol âOCâ. 5 9. A motion picture theater shall maintain documents 6 sufficient to demonstrate compliance with the requirements of 7 this section for a period of at least one year. 8